District of Columbia statutes.
47-1806.09e

Tax on residents and nonresidents; credits; lower income, long-term homeowner credit — Carryover of credit.

If the credit allowed under § 47-1806.09a exceeds the total income tax liability of the eligible resident under § 47-1806.03 for the tax year in which the credit is allowed, the eligible resident may claim a refund in the amount of the excess.

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 401(b), 49 DCR 1468
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1172(f), 51 DCR 8441
D.C. Law 15-205 substituted “§ 47-1806.09a” for “§ 47-1806.08a” and substituted “tax” for “taxable”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of Lower Income, Long-Term Homeowner Credit Administration Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-179, September 8, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 9221).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of Lower Income, Long-term Homeowner Credit Administration Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-421, May 10, 2004, 51 DCR 5174).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1172(f) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1172(f) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).